Connecticut, session 2026, HB05065.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction for any stipend paid by a municipality,
a volunteer fire department of a municipality or a volunteer ambulance
association of a municipality, to a volunteer firefighter or volunteer
ambulance member.